Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.310

Financial aid advising day.

(1)(a) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, all school districts with a high school must provide a financial aid advising day, as defined in RCW 28A.300.815.

(b) Districts must provide both a financial aid advising day and notification of financial aid opportunities at the beginning of each school year to parents and guardians of any student entering the twelfth grade. The notification must include information regarding:

(i) The eligibility requirements of the Washington college grant;

(ii) The requirements of the financial aid advising day;

(iii) The process for opting out of the financial aid advising day; and

(iv) Any community-based resources available to assist parents and guardians in understanding the requirements of and how to complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid.

(2) Districts may administer the financial aid advising day, as defined in RCW 28A.300.815, in accordance with information-sharing requirements set in the high school and beyond plan in RCW 28A.230.212 and 28A.230.215.

(3) The Washington state school directors' association, with assistance from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington student achievement council, shall develop a model policy and procedure that school district board of directors may adopt. The model policy and procedure must describe minimum standards for a financial aid advising day as defined in RCW 28A.300.815.

(4) School districts are encouraged to engage in the Washington student achievement council's financial aid advising training.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the implementation of this section.

[ 2023 c 271 s 7; 2020 c 307 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 271: See note following RCW 28A.230.215.

Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2020 c 307: See notes following RCW 28B.77.290.